apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <pardef n="e/z__prn">
        <e><p><l>z</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>zt</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nnek</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bben</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bből</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ela"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hhez</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bbe</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nnel</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>zen</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kkor</l><r>kkor<s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>zzel</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>zek</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>zeket</l><r>z<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- valami : valamit : valamik -->
    <pardef n="valami__prn">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>k</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ket</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kben</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>khez</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kbe</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>knél</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ken</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- egyik : egyiket : egyikek : egyike -->
    <pardef n="egyik__prn">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ket</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kben</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>khez</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>kbe</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>knél</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ken</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- mely : melyet : melyek -->
    <pardef n="mely__prn">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- olyan : olyant : olyanok -->
    <pardef n="olyan__prn">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ok</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- ilyen : ilyent : ilyenek -->
    <pardef n="ilyen__prn">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>t</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

    <!-- maga : magát : magák -->
    <pardef n="mag/a__prn">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>át</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ában</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ához</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ába</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ánál</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>án</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>uk</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ukat</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ukban</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ukhoz</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ukba</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>uknál</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ukon</l><r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

      <!-- }}}
           {{{ SECTION: Numerals -->
    <pardef n="két__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="card"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- ordinals -->
    <pardef n="első__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="második__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="negyedik__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="XIV__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="1910__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="card"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-ben</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="card"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>-jén</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="card"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="egyéb"><i>egyéb</i><par n="mely__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ilyen"><i>ilyen</i><par n="ilyen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mind"><i>mind</i><par n="mely__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="maga"><i>mag</i><par n="mag/a__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="aki"><i>aki</i><par n="valami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="amely"><i>amely</i><par n="mely__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="amelyik"><i>amelyik</i><par n="egyik__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ami"><i>ami</i><par n="valami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="egyik"><i>egyik</i><par n="egyik__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ez"><i>e</i><par n="e/z__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ki"><i>ki</i><par n="valami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="másik"><i>másik</i><par n="valami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="melyik"><i>melyik</i><par n="valami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mely"><i>mely</i><par n="mely__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="minden"><i>minden</i><par n="valami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mindenki"><i>mindenki</i><par n="valami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="olyan"><i>olyan</i><par n="olyan__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="semmi"><i>semmi</i><par n="valami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="valaki"><i>valaki</i><par n="valami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="valami"><i>valami</i><par n="valami__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kettő"><i>kettő</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="négy"><i>négy</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hat"><i>hat</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nyolc"><i>nyolc</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tíz"><i>tíz</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="húsz"><i>húsz</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="negyven"><i>negyven</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hatvan"><i>hatvan</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nyolcvan"><i>nyolcvan</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="száz"><i>száz</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ötszáz"><i>ötszáz</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nyolcszáz"><i>nyolcszáz</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="négyezer"><i>négyezer</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nyolcezer"><i>nyolcezer</i><par n="két__num"/></e>
    <e lm="első"><i>első</i><par n="első__num"/></e>
    <e lm="egyedik"><i>egyedik</i><par n="negyedik__num"/></e>
    <e lm="harmadik"><i>harmadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="negyedik"><i>negyedik</i><par n="negyedik__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ötödik"><i>ötödik</i><par n="negyedik__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hatodik"><i>hatodik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hetedik"><i>hetedik</i><par n="negyedik__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nyolcadik"><i>nyolcadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="kilencedik"><i>kilencedik</i><par n="negyedik__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tizedik"><i>tizedik</i><par n="negyedik__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tizenegyedik"><i>tizenegyedik</i><par n="negyedik__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ezeregyszázadik"><i>ezeregyszázadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ezerháromszázadik"><i>ezerháromszázadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ezerhatszázadik"><i>ezerhatszázadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ezerkétszázadik"><i>ezerkétszázadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ezerkilencszázadik"><i>ezerkilencszázadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ezernyolcszázadik"><i>ezernyolcszázadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="háromszázadik"><i>háromszázadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hétszázadik"><i>hétszázadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="kettőszázadik"><i>kettőszázadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="négyszázadik"><i>négyszázadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ötszázadik"><i>ötszázadik</i><par n="második__num"/></e>
    <e lm="II"><i>II</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="III"><i>III</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="IIII"><i>IIII</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="IV"><i>IV</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="V"><i>V</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VI"><i>VI</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VII"><i>VII</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VIII"><i>VIII</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="X"><i>X</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XII"><i>XII</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XIV"><i>XIV</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVI"><i>XVI</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XVIII"><i>XVIII</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XX"><i>XX</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="C"><i>C</i><par n="XIV__num"/></e>
    <e lm="1"><re>[0-9]*[0124579]</re><par n="1910__num"/></e>
